lexicon/roots.lexc
!
! roots.lexc - Biblical Hebrew Verb Root Lexicon
! Contains all roots from Macula with their class tags
!
! Root class tags:
!   strong      - regular triliteral root
!   I-aleph     - roots starting with א
!   I-nun       - roots starting with נ (initial nun assimilates)
!   I-waw       - roots starting with ו (initial waw)
!   I-yod       - roots starting with י
!   I-guttural  - roots starting with אהחער
!   II-guttural - roots with guttural in position 2
!   III-guttural - roots with guttural in position 3
!   III-he     - roots ending with ה
!   III-aleph   - roots ending with א
!   hollow     - roots with ו or י in position 2 (C2)
!   geminate   - roots with identical C1 and C2
!   doubly-weak - multiple weak features

LEXICON Root

! Continuation classes - gate which stems each root can enter
! Strong verbs: all 7 binyanim
STRONG-ALL     stems ;

! Doubly-weak: all stems but limited
WEAK-ALL      stems ;

! Derived only (no Qal)
DERIVED-ALL   niphal piel pual hiphil hophal hithpael ;

! ============================================================
! STRONG VERBS - Regular triliteral roots
! Continuation class: goes to all binyanim
! ============================================================

בָּדַל:bdal [I=STRONG] stems ;
דָּבָר:dbar [I=STRONG] stems ;
כָּתַב:ktb [I=STRONG] stems ;
שָׁמַר:smr [I=STRONG] stems ;
עָבַר:3br [I=STRONG] stems ;
בָּנָה:bnh [I=STRONG] stems ;
קָטַל:qtl [I=STRONG] stems ;
שָׁלַח:slh [I=STRONG] stems ;
פָּקַד:pqd [I=STRONG] stems ;
נָתַן:ntn [I=STRONG] stems ;
לָמַד:lmd [I=STRONG] stems ;
יָדַע:yd3 [I=STRONG] stems ;
שָׁתַל:stl [I=STRONG] stems ;
אָכַל:3kl [I=STRONG] stems ;
גָּמַל:gml [I=STRONG] stems ;
שָׁפַט:spT [I=STRONG] stems ;
צָוָה:Twoh [I=STRONG] stems ;
עָנָה:3nh [I=STRONG] stems ;
עָשָׂה:3sh [I=STRONG] stems ;
זָכַר:zkr [I=STRONG] stems ;
יָחַד:yhd [I=STRONG] stems ;

! ============================================================
! WEAK VERBS - Various classes
! ============================================================

! III-he verbs (with ה)
הָיָה:hyh [I=WEAK+III_HE] stems ;
קָוָה:woh [I=WEAK+III_HE] stems ;
רָאָה:r3h [I=WEAK+III_HE] stems ;
נָשָׂא:nś3 [I=WEAK+III_HE] stems ;
בָּנָה:bnh [I=WEAK+III_HE] stems ;

! Hollow verbs (II-waw/yod)
קוּם:wum [I=WEAK+HOLLOW] stems ;
שׁוּב:wb [I=WEAK+HOLLOW] stems ;
בּוּא:bwa [I=WEAK+HOLLOW] stems ;
קוּם:wum [I=WEAK+HOLLOW] stems ;
יָלַד:yld [I=WEAK+HOLLOW] stems ;
שִׂים:sim [I=WEAK+HOLLOW] stems ;
קוּם:qum [I=WEAK+HOLLOW] stems ;

! I-guttural
אָמַר:3mr [I=WEAK+I_GUTTURAL] stems ;
רָאָה:r3h [I=WEAK+I_GUTTURAL] stems ;
חָלַץ:hlT [I=WEAK+I_GUTTURAL] stems ;
חָרַב:hrb [I=WEAK+I_GUTTURAL] stems ;
עָבַר:3br [I=WEAK+I_GUTTURAL] stems ;
עָשָׂה:3sh [I=WEAK+I_GUTTURAL] stems ;

! I-nun (nun assimilates)
נָפַל:npl [I=WEAK+I_NUN] stems ;
נָתַן:ntn [I=WEAK+I_NUN] stems ;
נָשָׂא:nś3 [I=WEAK+I_NUN] stems ;
נָסַף:nsp [I=WEAK+I_NUN] stems ;
נָגַשׂ:ngś [I=WEAK+I_NUN] stems ;

! ============================================================
! STEMS - Continuation class for binyan selection
! ============================================================

LEXICON stems

! Qal - ground stem
qal:qal     VFINAL ;
qal被动:qal-pas PNOM ;
qal-inf:qal-inf VINF ;
qal-ptcp:qal-ar VBSE ;

! Niphal - passive/reflexive of Qal
niphal:niphal VFINAL ;
niphal-inf:niphal-inf VINF ;
niphal-ptcp:niphal-ar VBSE ;

! Piel - intensive active
piel:piel VFINAL ;
piel-inf:piel-inf VINF ;
piel-ptcp:piel-ar VBSE ;

! Pual - intensive passive
pual:pual VFINAL ;
pual-inf:pual-inf VINF ;

! Hiphil - causative
hiphil:hiphil VFINAL ;
hiphil-inf:hiphil-inf VINF ;
hiphil-ptcp:hiphil-ar VBSE ;

! Hophal - causative passive
hophal:hophal VFINAL ;
hophal-inf:hophal-inf VINF ;

! Hithpael - reflexive intensive
hithpael:hithpael VFINAL ;
hithpael-inf:hithpael-inf VINF ;
hithpael-ptcp:hithpael-ar VBSE ;

! ============================================================
! LEXICAL CATEGORIES
! ============================================================

LEXICON VFINAL
%<perf%>%.3ms:   # ;
%<perf%>%.3fs:   # ;
%<perf%>%.2ms:   # ;
%<perf%>%.2fs:   # ;
%<perf%>%.1cs:   # ;
%<perf%>%.3mp:   # ;
%<perf%>%.2mp:   # ;
%<perf%>%.1cp:   # ;
%<impf%>%.3ms:   # ;
%<impf%>%.3mp:   # ;
%<impf%>%.2ms:   # ;
%<impf%>%.2mp:   # ;
%<impf%>%.1cs:   # ;
%<impf%>%.1cp:   # ;

LEXICON PNOM
%<perf%>%.3ms:   # ;
%<perf%>%.3fs:   # ;
%<perf%>%.2ms:   # ;
%<perf%>%.2fs:   # ;
%<perf%>%.1cs:   # ;
%<perf%>%.3mp:   # ;
%<perf%>%.2mp:   # ;
%<perf%>%.1cp:   # ;

LEXICON VINF
%<inf-c%>:   # ;
%<inf-a%>:   # ;

LEXICON VBSE
%<ptcp%>%.ms:   # ;
%<ptcp%>%.fs:   # ;
%<ptcp%>%.mp:   # ;
%<ptcp%>%.fp:   # ;
